Nevada, session 83, SB326.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 704.095 is hereby amended to read as follows:
704.095 1. The Commission shall adopt regulations which
provide simplified procedures or methodologies for a change of
rates for those public utilities which furnish water or services for the
disposal of sewage, or both, to persons within this State for
compensation, and which:
(a) Serve 3,000 or fewer persons; and
(b) Had during the immediately preceding 12-month period
gross sales for water or services for the disposal of sewage
amounting to $2,000,000 or less. If a public utility furnishes both
water and services for the disposal of sewage, its gross sales for
each service must be considered separately for determining whether
the public utility qualifies under this paragraph for either service.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. The regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to
subsection 1 must provide, without limitation, for the filing of letters
of advice to change rates based on a nationally recognized inflation
index approved by the Commission.
3. A public utility described in subsection 1 which is located
in a county whose population is 700,000 or more and which serves
at least 250 persons shall, each year on or before a date
established by the Commission, submit to the Commission a report
that includes, without limitation:
(a) Information concerning the adequacy of the infrastructure
of the public utility, including, without limitation, the adequacy of
the infrastructure to furnish a reasonably adequate supply of
water for fire protection as required by NRS 704.660 and the
sufficiency and availability of any water rights that are necessary
to provide service; and
(b) Any other information related to the infrastructure of the
public utility that the Commission may require by regulation.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)